New York, session 2025-2026, S7942.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 344-r to 2 read as follows: 3 § 344-r. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to Lieu- 4 tenant Roland "The Gator" Ward. All that portion of the state highway 5 system constituting a portion of state route 42 in the town of Falls- 6 burg, county of Sullivan, from the intersection of state route 42 and 7 Railroad Plaza to 5286-5288 Main Street, shall be dedicated to Lt Gator 8 Ward. 9 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 10 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 11 pursuant to section one of this act. However, to avoid confusion and to 12 limit any possible disruption of commerce, the dedication called for 13 pursuant to section one of this act shall be one of ceremonial nature 14 and the official name of such highway shall not be changed as a result 15 of this act. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13052-02-5